Maine, session 132, LD317.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA c. 37 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 37
SAFE COSMETICS ACT
§3301. Short title
This chapter may be known and cited as "the Safe Cosmetics Act."
§3302. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Cosmetic product. "Cosmetic product" means an article for retail sale or
professional use intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled or sprayed on, introduced into or
otherwise applied to the human body for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness
or altering the appearance. "Cosmetic product" does not include:
A. Soap;
B. Dietary supplements; or
C. Food and drugs regulated by the United States Food and Drug Administration.
2. Ingredient. "Ingredient" means a single chemical entity or mixture used as a
component in the manufacture of a cosmetic product. "Ingredient" does not include an
incidental ingredient as described in 21 Code of Federal Regulations, Section 701.3(l).
3. Intentionally added ingredient. "Intentionally added ingredient" means an
ingredient added during the manufacture of a cosmetic product or a component of a
cosmetic product to provide a specific characteristic, appearance or quality or to perform a
specific function.
4. Manufacturer. "Manufacturer" means a person whose name appears on the label
of a cosmetic product pursuant to the requirements of 21 Code of Federal Regulations,
Section 701.12.
§3303. Prohibition on sale and distribution of certain cosmetic products
1. Prohibition. Beginning January 1, 2027, a person may not distribute, sell or offer
for sale in this State a cosmetic product containing any of the following intentionally added
ingredients: lead; mercury; dibutyl phthalate; diethylhexyl phthalate; formaldehyde;
paraformaldehyde; quaternium-15; methylene glycol; m-phenylenediamine;
o-phenylenediamine; triclosan; triclocarban; or nonylphenol.
2. Exclusion. The distribution, sale or offering for sale of a cosmetic product in this
State does not violate the prohibition in subsection 1 if the cosmetic product contains a
technically unavoidable trace quantity of an ingredient identified in subsection 1 and that
trace quantity is present:
A. Due to impurities:
Page 1 - 132LR1786(01)

(1) From a natural or synthetic ingredient used in the manufacture of the cosmetic
product;
(2) From the manufacturing process; or
(3) From the storage of the cosmetic product; or
B. Due to migration of the ingredient from the packaging of the cosmetic product into
the cosmetic product.
§3304. Retailer indemnification
If a cosmetic product delivered to a retailer in the State by the manufacturer is
subsequently determined to contain an intentionally added ingredient such that the cosmetic
product is prohibited from being distributed, sold or offered for sale in this State under
section 3303, the retailer is entitled to a full refund from the manufacturer with respect to
that cosmetic product, including shipping and other related costs.
§3305. Rules
The department may adopt rules to implement this chapter. Rules adopted pursuant to
this section are routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.